Vermont, session 2025-2026, H272.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. § 4411 is amended to read:
§ 4411. ZONING BYLAWS
* * *
(b) All zoning bylaws shall apply to all lands within the municipality other
than as specifically limited or exempted in accordance with specific standards
included within those bylaws and in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter. The provisions of those bylaws may be classified so that different
provisions may be applied to different classes of situations, uses, and structures
VT LEG #380663 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.272
2025 Page 2 of 3
and to different and separate districts of the municipality as may be described
by a zoning map made part of the bylaws. The land use map required pursuant
to subdivision 4382(a)(2) of this title of any municipality may be designated as
the zoning map except in cases in which districts are not deemed by the
planning commission to be described in sufficient accuracy or detail by the
municipal plan land use map. All provisions shall be uniform for each class of
use or structure within each district, except that additional classifications may
be made within any district for any or all of the following:
* * *
(3) To regulate, restrict, or prohibit uses or structures at or near any of
the following:
(A) Major thoroughfares, their intersections and interchanges, and
transportation arteries.
(B) Natural or artificial bodies of water.
(C) Places of relatively steep slope or grade. [Repealed.]
(D) Public buildings and public grounds.
(E) Aircraft and helicopter facilities.
(F) Places having unique patriotic, ecological, historical,
archaeological, or community interest or value, or located within scenic or
design control districts.
VT LEG #380663 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.272
2025 Page 3 of 3
(G) Flood or other hazard areas and other places having a special
character or use affecting or affected by their surroundings.
(H) River corridors, river corridor protection areas, and buffers, as
the term “buffer” is defined in 10 V.S.A. § 1422.
(4) To regulate, restrict, or prohibit uses or structures in overlay
districts, as set forth in subdivision 4414(2) of this title.
(5) To regulate, but not prohibit, uses or structures at or near relatively
steep slopes or grades.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380663 v.2